California, session 20252026, AB302.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 10 (commencing with Section 49058) is added to Chapter 6 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read: Article 10. Extracurricular Activities49058. (a) (1) Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a local educational agency shall not exclude a pupil from participating in any extracurricular activity, including sports and clubs, due to the pupil not having or using addictive feeds.(2) Local educational agencies are encouraged to inform pupils and pupils’ parents or guardians about the pupils’ rights described in paragraph (1) in its pupil handbook or a similar document made generally available to pupils and their parents or guardians.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Addictive feed” means an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, in which multiple pieces of media generated or shared by users are, either concurrently or sequentially, recommended, selected, or prioritized for display to a user based, in whole or in part, on information provided by the user, or otherwise associated with the user or the user’s device, unless any of the following conditions are met:(A) The information is not persistently associated with the user or user’s device and does not concern the user’s previous interactions with media generated or shared by others.(B) The information consists of search terms that are not persistently associated with the user or user’s device.(C) The information consists of user-selected privacy or accessibility settings, technical information concerning the user’s device, or device communications or signals concerning whether the user is a minor.(D) The user expressly and unambiguously requested the specific media or media by the author, creator, or poster of the media, or the blocking, prioritization, or deprioritization of that media, provided that the media is not recommended, selected, or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information associated with the user or the user’s device, except as otherwise permitted by this chapter and, if the media is audio or video content, is not automatically played.(E) The media consists of direct, private communications between users.(F) The media recommended, selected, or prioritized for display is exclusively the next media in a preexisting sequence from the same author, creator, poster, or source and, if the media is audio or video content, is not automatically played.(G) The recommendation, selection, or prioritization of the media is necessary to comply with state or federal law. (2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.SEC. 2. Section 51103 is added to the Education Code, to read:51103. (a) (1) Commencing with the 2027–28 school year, a local educational agency is prohibited from using addictive feeds as the only means of contacting pupils or pupils’ parents or guardians.(2) Local educational agencies are encouraged to inform pupils and pupils’ parents or guardians about the pupils’ rights described in paragraph (1) in its pupil handbook or a similar document made generally available to pupils and their parents or guardians.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Addictive feed” means an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, in which multiple pieces of media generated or shared by users are, either concurrently or sequentially, recommended, selected, or prioritized for display to a user based, in whole or in part, on information provided by the user, or otherwise associated with the user or the user’s device, unless any of the following conditions are met:(A) The information is not persistently associated with the user or user’s device and does not concern the user’s previous interactions with media generated or shared by others.(B) The information consists of search terms that are not persistently associated with the user or user’s device.(C) The information consists of user-selected privacy or accessibility settings, technical information concerning the user’s device, or device communications or signals concerning whether the user is a minor.(D) The user expressly and unambiguously requested the specific media or media by the author, creator, or poster of the media, or the blocking, prioritization, or deprioritization of that media, provided that the media is not recommended, selected, or prioritized for display based, in whole or in part, on other information associated with the user or the user’s device, except as otherwise permitted by this chapter and, if the media is audio or video content, is not automatically played.(E) The media consists of direct, private communications between users.(F) The media recommended, selected, or prioritized for display is exclusively the next media in a preexisting sequence from the same author, creator, poster, or source and, if the media is audio or video content, is not automatically played.(G) The recommendation, selection, or prioritization of the media is necessary to comply with state or federal law. (2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.